Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.012, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Vehicles registered by certain deleted text begin veteransdeleted text end new text begin ownersnew text end . (a)new text begin For purposes of this subdivision, "eligible owner" means any of the following:new text end new text begin (1) a veteran with a total service-connected disability, as defined in section 171.01, subdivision 51; and new text end new text begin (2) an active member of a volunteer fire department who provides documentation from the chief of the fire department. new text end new text begin (b)new text end A passenger automobile, one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle registered by deleted text begin a veteran with a total service-connected disability, as defined in section 171.01, subdivision 51,deleted text end new text begin an eligible ownernew text end is not subject to: (1) registration taxes under this chapter; (2) administrative fees imposed under subdivision 1c; (3) filing fees and surcharges imposed under section 168.33, subdivision 7; or (4) plate and validation sticker fees imposed under this chapter, including but not limited to: (i) fees under section 168.12, subdivision 5; (ii) fees identified in any section authorizing special plates; and (iii) transfer fees. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The exemptions under this subdivision apply to a motor vehicle that is jointly registered by deleted text begin a qualifying veterandeleted text end new text begin an eligible ownernew text end and a spouse or domestic partner. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The fees identified under paragraph deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end , clause (4), do not include: (1) a fee for personalized plates under section 168.12, subdivision 2a; or (2) a required contribution or donation for a special plate, including but not limited to a contribution under sections 168.1255, subdivision 1, clause (6); 168.1258, subdivision 1, clause (4); 168.1259, subdivision 2, new text begin paragraph (a), new text end clause (5); 168.1287, subdivision 1, clause (5); 168.129, subdivision 1, clause (5); 168.1295, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (5); 168.1296, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (5); and 168.1299, subdivision 1, clause (3). deleted text begin (d) A qualifying veterandeleted text end new text begin (e)new text end new text begin An eligible ownernew text end may register no more than two motor vehicles at the same time with the exemptions under this subdivision. Nothing in this paragraph prevents registration of additional motor vehicles as otherwise provided in this chapter. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after January 1, 2026. new text end